Hawaii statutes.
[§291-13] Traffic laws apply to
persons driving mopeds. Every person driving a moped upon a roadway shall
be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties
applicable to the driver of a vehicle under this chapter except as to the special
provisions of this part and except as to those provisions of this chapter which
by their nature can have no application. [L 1981, c 24, §1]

Cross References

Special rules for mopeds, see §§291C-191 to 207.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next